Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1335YH (4) 91 nls/ko H.F. 5 Section 1. Section 514C.22, subsection 3, paragraph g, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 g. Autistic disorders Autism spectrum disorder, as that term 3 is defined in section 514C.28, subsection 2 . 4 Sec. 2. Section 514C.22, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 4. The commissioner, by rule, shall define the biologically 7 based mental illnesses identified in subsection 3 , paragraphs 8 âaâ through âfâ . Definitions established by the commissioner 9 shall be consistent with definitions provided in the most 10 recent edition of the American psychiatric associationâs 11 diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, as such 12 definitions may be amended from time to time. The commissioner 13 may adopt the definitions provided in such manual by reference. 14 Sec. 3. Section 514C.22, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Notwithstanding paragraphs âaâ and âbâ , 17 a group policy, contract, or plan covered under this section 18 shall not impose an aggregate annual or lifetime limit on 19 biologically based mental illness coverage benefits for autism 20 spectrum disorder. 21 Sec. 4. Section 514C.22, subsection 8, unnumbered paragraph 22 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 A group policy, contract, or plan covered under this 24 section shall at a minimum allow for thirty inpatient days 25 and fifty-two outpatient visits annually , and shall not 26 limit the number of outpatient visits a covered individual 27 may have with a practitioner for applied behavior analysis 28 under section 514C.31, or with an autism service provider for 29 treatment of autism spectrum disorder under section 514C.28 . 30 The policy, contract, or plan may also include deductibles, 31 coinsurance, or copayments, provided the amounts and extent 32 of such deductibles, coinsurance, or copayments applicable to 33 other health, medical, or surgical services coverage under the 34 policy, contract, or plan are the same. It is not a violation 35 -1- LSB 1335YH (4) 91 nls/ko 1/ 5 H.F. 5 of this section if the policy, contract, or plan excludes 1 entirely from coverage benefits for the cost of providing the 2 following: 3 Sec. 5. Section 514C.28, subsections 1, 3, and 5, Code 2025, 4 are amended to read as follows: 5 1. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment requirements 6 of section 514C.6 , a group plan established pursuant to chapter 7 509A for employees of the state providing for third-party 8 payment or prepayment of health, medical, and surgical coverage 9 benefits shall provide coverage benefits to covered individuals 10 under twenty-one years of age for the diagnostic assessment 11 of autism spectrum disorder and for the treatment of autism 12 spectrum disorder. 13 3. Coverage is required pursuant to this section in a 14 maximum benefit amount of not more than thirty-six thousand 15 dollars per year but shall not be subject to any limits on 16 the number of visits to a covered individual may have with 17 an autism service provider for treatment of autism spectrum 18 disorder. The commissioner shall, on or before April 1 of 19 each calendar year, publish an adjustment to the maximum 20 benefit required equal to the percentage change in the United 21 States department of labor consumer price index for all urban 22 consumers in the preceding year, and the published adjusted 23 maximum benefit shall be applicable to group policies, 24 contracts, or plans subject to this section that are issued 25 or renewed on or after January 1 of the following calendar 26 year. Payments made under a group plan subject to this section 27 on behalf of a covered individual for treatment of a health 28 condition unrelated to or distinguishable from the individualâs 29 autism spectrum disorder shall not be applied toward any 30 maximum benefit established under this subsection . 31 5. Coverage required by this section shall be provided 32 in coordination with coverage required for the treatment of 33 autistic disorders autism spectrum disorder pursuant to section 34 514C.22 . 35 -2- LSB 1335YH (4) 91 nls/ko 2/ 5 H.F. 5 Sec. 6. Section 514C.31, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 1 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment requirements of 3 section 514C.6 , a group policy, contract, or plan providing 4 for third-party payment or prepayment of health, medical, and 5 surgical coverage benefits shall provide coverage benefits for 6 applied behavior analysis provided by a practitioner to covered 7 individuals under nineteen years of age for the treatment of 8 autism spectrum disorder pursuant to a treatment plan if the 9 policy, contract, or plan is either of the following: 10 Sec. 7. Section 514C.31, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 11 by striking the subsection. 12 Sec. 8. Section 514C.31, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, are 13 amended to read as follows: 14 4. Coverage required pursuant to this section may be 15 subject to dollar limits, deductibles, copayments, or 16 coinsurance provisions that apply to other medical and surgical 17 services under the policy, contract, or plan , subject to the 18 requirements of subsection 3 . 19 5. Coverage required pursuant to this section may be 20 subject to care management provisions of the applicable 21 policy, contract, or plan, including prior authorization , and 22 prior approval , and limits on the number of visits a covered 23 individual may make for applied behavior analysis . 24 Sec. 9. APPLICABILITY. 25 1. The sections of this Act amending section 514C.22 apply 26 to third-party payment provider policies, contracts, and plans 27 as specified in section 514C.22 that are delivered, issued 28 for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after 29 January 1, 2026. 30 2. The sections of this Act amending section 514C.28 apply 31 to a group plan established pursuant to chapter 509A for 32 employees of the state that are delivered, issued for delivery, 33 continued, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 34 2026. 35 -3- LSB 1335YH (4) 91 nls/ko 3/ 5 H.F. 5 3. The sections of this Act amending section 514C.31 1 apply to third-party provider payment contracts, policies, or 2 plans specified in section 514C.31, subsection 1, paragraph 3 âaâ, or to plans established pursuant to chapter 509A for 4 public employees other than employees of the state, that are 5 delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this 6 state on or after January 1, 2026. 7